Wisconsin, session 2025, AB75.
do enact as follows:AB75,1Section 1. 165.845 (1r) (a) 3. of the statutes is created to read:165.845 (1r) (a) 3. For each case involving a crime, as defined in s. 939.12, that resulted in charges being filed in any circuit court, all of the following information:a. The county in which the case was filed.b. The name of the prosecuting attorney assigned to the case.c. The name of the court official assigned to the case.d. The criminal charge filed.e. The arrest charge from the arresting law enforcement agency, if applicable.f. Whether any charge relating to the case was dismissed.g. Whether the case resulted in a conviction.AB75,2Section 2. 165.845 (1r) (f) of the statutes is created to read:165.845 (1r) (f) Establish an interactive dashboard that does not contain any personally identifying information for a criminal defendant that is accessible on the department of justice’s website that includes, at a minimum, all information that is collected under par. (a) 3., and annually submit to the chief clerk of each house of the legislature for distribution to the appropriate standing committees under s. 13.172 (3) a report that includes a summary of the information that is collected under par. (a) 3.AB75,5Section 5. Effective date.(1) This act takes effect on January 1, 2026. Down Down /2025/related/enrolled/ab75 true enrolledbills /2025/related/enrolled/ab75 enrolledbills/2025/REG/AB75 enrolledbills/2025/REG/AB75 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Enrolled Legislation»AB75: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting